lexc/noun/enhuoeae.lexc
!!!enhuoe.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§uue§ §J§ §UUE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §AE1§
§VV§   §oeoez4§  §oeoez5§ §OEOE3§ §OEOE4§ §EOA1§ §ooez4§ §oeoez31§
§b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez4§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA1§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4§t§OEOE3§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez5§k    Gen;
                           Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez31§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounful
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possful;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possful
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez4§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA1§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4§t§OEOE3§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounfurj
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possfurj;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possfurj
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez4§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA1§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4§t§OEOE3§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounat
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possat;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez4§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA1§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4§t§OEOE3§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Noun
Kétvölgy AddNoun;
abroncsfül AddNounful;
acélfül AddNounful;
adjunktushölgy AddNoun;
agyagfül AddNounful;
agyvelőügy AddNoun;
agárfül AddNounful;
alapkönyv AddNoun;
almafatörzs AddNoun;
alufóliafül AddNounful;
anyagtörzs AddNoun;
apácafül AddNounful;
aranyfül AddNounful;
asszisztenshölgy AddNoun;
asszonyfül AddNounful;
autópályaügy AddNoun;
azonosítófül AddNounful;
balfül AddNounful;
bambuszrügy AddNoun;
barlangügy AddNoun;
barátfül AddNounful;
basafül AddNounful;
beszélgetéskönyv AddNoun;
betűmintakönyv AddNoun;
bevásárlószatyorfül AddNounful;
beépítőfül AddNounful;
bilifül AddNounful;
birkózófül AddNounful;
biztosításügy AddNoun;
biztosítófül AddNounful;
borkönyv AddNoun;
borítófül AddNounful;
botfül AddNounful;
bozótszörny AddNoun;
bádogfül AddNounful;
bálványszörny AddNoun;
bárányfül AddNounful;
bástyafül AddNounful;
bélyegkönyv AddNoun;
bónuszfül AddNounful;
bögrefül AddNounful;
böngészőfül AddNounful;
börtönügy AddNoun;
büféügy AddNoun;
bőrfül AddNounful;
bőröndfül AddNounful;
cetszörny AddNoun;
cicafül AddNounful;
ciánügy AddNoun;
csacsifül AddNounful;
csatornaügy AddNoun;
csecsemőfül AddNounful;
csigakönyv AddNoun;
csizmafül AddNounful;
csodafül AddNounful;
csodafürj AddNounfurj;
csokifül AddNounful;
csomagügy AddNoun;
csészefül AddNounful;
csókafül AddNounful;
csúcsszörny AddNoun;
cuclifül AddNounful;
céklaügy AddNoun;
darutörzs AddNoun;
disznófül AddNounful;
diákügy AddNoun;
drogügy AddNoun;
dárdafül AddNounful;
díszletügy AddNoun;
edényfül AddNounful;
egérfül AddNounful;
egészségkönyv AddNoun;
elefántfül AddNounful;
elitfül AddNounful;
ellenőrhölgy AddNoun;
emberfül AddNounful;
emelőfül AddNounful;
emlékügy AddNoun;
eszkimótörzs AddNoun;
ezüstkönny AddNoun;
fafül AddNounful;
farkaskönny AddNoun;
fazékfül AddNounful;
felderítőtörzs AddNoun;
felfogatófül AddNounful;
felhőfül AddNounful;
felújításügy AddNoun;
filmszakkönyv AddNoun;
focikönyv AddNoun;
fogasfürj AddNounfurj;
fogyasztásügy AddNoun;
fogófül AddNounful;
forgatókönyv AddNoun;
forgófül AddNounful;
forrasztófül AddNounful;
frizurakönyv AddNoun;
fékügy AddNoun;
félfül AddNounful;
fémfül AddNounful;
férfifül AddNounful;
férfiszörny AddNoun;
fóliafül AddNounful;
föl AddNounful;
földrengésügy AddNoun;
függesztőfül AddNounful;
fül AddNounful;
fürj AddNounfurj;
főhölgy AddNoun;
fűszerügy AddNoun;
fűzőfül AddNounful;
gazdagságügy AddNoun;
golfévkönyv AddNoun;
gombfül AddNounful;
gumifül AddNounful;
gumiügy AddNoun;
gyerekfül AddNounful;
gyermekfül AddNounful;
gyermekverseskönyv AddNoun;
gyártmánykönyv AddNoun;
gyógyszerügy AddNoun;
gázügy AddNoun;
gödörügy AddNoun;
hajtásrügy AddNoun;
halügy AddNoun;
harmincadügy AddNoun;
helikopterügy AddNoun;
hevederfül AddNounful;
hittankönyv AddNoun;
honlapügy AddNoun;
hordozófül AddNounful;
hurkafül AddNounful;
hálakönny AddNoun;
hálófül AddNounful;
háztartáskönyv AddNoun;
hóügy AddNoun;
ikertölgy AddNoun;
ikonfül AddNounful;
indexkézikönyv AddNoun;
indiánfül AddNounful;
ingerhölgy AddNoun;
irodahölgy AddNoun;
italügy AddNoun;
jakfül AddNounful;
japánfürj AddNounfurj;
jelenügy AddNoun;
jutalomkönyv AddNoun;
jógakönyv AddNoun;
júdásfül AddNounful;
kagylófül AddNounful;
kalandorhölgy AddNoun;
kamaszfül AddNounful;
kamionügy AddNoun;
kancsófül AddNounful;
kanálfül AddNounful;
kapaszkodófül AddNounful;
kapcsolófül AddNounful;
karfiolfül AddNounful;
karikafül AddNounful;
karikatúrakönyv AddNoun;
kartonfül AddNounful;
katasztrófaügy AddNoun;
kecskefül AddNounful;
kefefül AddNounful;
kegydíjügy AddNoun;
kertészkönyv AddNoun;
kijáratügy AddNoun;
kitöltőfül AddNounful;
kiírókönyv AddNoun;
kokárdaügy AddNoun;
korsófül AddNounful;
kosárfül AddNounful;
kreditügy AddNoun;
kuktafül AddNounful;
kultúrfül AddNounful;
kutyafül AddNounful;
kutyahölgy AddNoun;
kémiatankönyv AddNoun;
kódkönyv AddNoun;
kötélfül AddNounful;
közkönyvtárügy AddNoun;
középfül AddNounful;
kőfül AddNounful;
lakatfül AddNounful;
lantosvölgy AddNoun;
lapfül AddNounful;
lapátfül AddNounful;
legyezőfül AddNounful;
lehúzófül AddNounful;
lekötőfül AddNounful;
lenyitófül AddNounful;
lepényfül AddNounful;
lerántófül AddNounful;
leányfül AddNounful;
licencügy AddNoun;
lábasfül AddNounful;
látszatügy AddNoun;
lófül AddNounful;
mackófül AddNounful;
madárszörny AddNoun;
majomfül AddNounful;
mappafül AddNounful;
masszőzhölgy AddNoun;
medvefül AddNounful;
mennyiségtankönyv AddNoun;
menüfül AddNounful;
mintaügy AddNoun;
mozaikkönyv AddNoun;
mágnáshölgy AddNoun;
márványfül AddNounful;
mítoszkönyv AddNoun;
mókusfül AddNounful;
műfül AddNounful;
nagyútikönyv AddNoun;
nyaralóügy AddNoun;
nyuszifül AddNounful;
nyírfarügy AddNoun;
négyzetfül AddNounful;
névnapügy AddNoun;
operavezérkönyv AddNoun;
oroszlánfül AddNounful;
osztályzókönyv AddNoun;
papírfül AddNounful;
paraszttörzs AddNoun;
patentfül AddNounful;
pecsenyefürj AddNounfurj;
piacügy AddNoun;
piskótafül AddNounful;
polgárjogkönyv AddNoun;
programkézikönyv AddNoun;
propellerfül AddNounful;
párbajkönyv AddNoun;
püspökkönyv AddNoun;
ragasztófül AddNounful;
reklámkézikönyv AddNoun;
robothölgy AddNoun;
ráhajtófül AddNounful;
részénekeskönyv AddNoun;
sapkafül AddNounful;
sertésügy AddNoun;
sportévkönyv AddNoun;
szabályozásügy AddNoun;
szalagfül AddNounful;
szatyorfül AddNounful;
szektaügy AddNoun;
szeszügy AddNoun;
szoknyaügy AddNoun;
szolgáltatásfül AddNounful;
szállítókönyv AddNoun;
szétverésügy AddNoun;
szúnyogügy AddNoun;
sóügy AddNoun;
tanulótankönyv AddNoun;
taplófül AddNounful;
tehénfül AddNounful;
teknősügy AddNoun;
terepkézikönyv AddNoun;
textilfül AddNounful;
tinikönyv AddNoun;
tudománykönyv AddNoun;
tányérfül AddNounful;
társalkodóhölgy AddNoun;
tépőfül AddNounful;
tölcsérfül AddNounful;
tölgy AddNoun;
törpefürj AddNounfurj;
tüdőkönyv AddNoun;
utódtörzs AddNoun;
vadászfül AddNounful;
varázslókönyv AddNoun;
vasalásfül AddNounful;
vezetékfül AddNounful;
viaszszörny AddNoun;
vitorlafül AddNounful;
vizsgaügy AddNoun;
választófül AddNounful;
vándorlásügy AddNoun;
védőfül AddNounful;
vízegészségügy AddNoun;
weblapfül AddNounful;
zsebfül AddNounful;
zsenikönyv AddNoun;
zárófül AddNounful;
államegészségügy AddNoun;
árvaügy AddNoun;
érmeügy AddNoun;
óriásfül AddNounful;
önreklámügy AddNoun;
öntecsfül AddNounful;
ördögfül AddNounful;
üdvösségügy AddNoun;
őstörzs AddNoun;
őz AddNounat;
